Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LUNDSTRUM CENTER FOR THE PERFORMING ARTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for grants to the Lundstrum Center for the Performing Arts for after-school educational programming that includes instruction in dance, voice, and drama. Up to .... percent of the grants may be used for capital improvements. new text end